Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.030

Procedure for filing of claims.

(1) All claims under this chapter must be filed in superior court. The venue for such actions is governed by RCW 4.12.020.

(2) Service of the summons and complaint is governed by RCW 4.28.080.

[ 2013 c 175 s 3.]